Oklahoma, session 2026, SB313.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 3130, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 3130. A. Monies received by the county treasurer at


resale from individual purchasers, not redemptioners, shall


nevertheless be deemed to be collections of tax, and if no


redemption be had before issuance and delivery of a deed therefor,


the tax monies so collected, not including excess proceeds to be


held for the owner thereof, shall be credited and apportioned as


such taxes would have been apportioned had they been paid in the


proper time and manner, and the monies so collected representing


penalties on ad valorem tax, listing fees and publication costs


shall be credited to the “resale property fund” of such county as

Req. No. 1555 Page 1


hereinafter provided. In instances where vacant lots are offered


for sale for both ad valorem taxes and special improvement taxes,


but are sold for less than the total sum due, the county treasurer


shall, after deducting the listing fees and publication costs,


apportion the proceeds of such sale ratably between the ad valorem


and special improvement tax accounts in the same ratio such proceeds


bear to the total tax published as due for such resale.


B. If, after all reasonable efforts to return the excess


proceeds to the owner of the property resold pursuant to the


provisions of Section 3105 et seq. of this title, the proceeds shall


be remitted to the State Treasurer for deposit in the Unclaimed


Property Fund created pursuant to Section 668 of Title 60 of the


Oklahoma Statutes.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-1555 QD 12/31/2024 12:05:51 AM

















Req. No. 1555 Page 2